Maine, session 132, LD1465.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §13053, 2nd ¶, as amended by PL 1987, c. 816, Pt. P, §6, is further
amended to read:
The department shall encourage the creation and retention of quality jobs through
increased public, nonprofit and private sector investment and work to enhance the quality
of life for all by assisting local governments and nonprofit organizations to plan and
implement comprehensive community planning and development strategies.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §13055, sub-§1, ¶F, as amended by PL 2003, c. 673, Pt. M, §2,
is further amended to read:
F. The Office of Community Development; and
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §13055, sub-§1, ¶G, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 673, Pt. M, §2, is
amended to read:
G. The Office of Innovation.; and
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §13055, sub-§1, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. The Office of Workforce Advancement.
Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §13062-B is enacted to read:
§13062-B. Office of Workforce Advancement
The Office of Workforce Advancement is established within the department. The office
shall support the advancement of the State's workforce in coordination with the State
Workforce Board, established under Title 26, section 2006. The office shall reduce barriers
to workforce participation in areas such as health care, housing, child care, direct care,
education and training and increase investment in workforce participation.